New Mexico, session 2026, HB87.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million dollars (1,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the health care authority for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to provide funding to an organization located in Dona Ana county that uses a soteria model to provide long-term residential treatment services for people diagnosed with serious mental illness and psychosis. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233196.1